Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 5. Conservators of Estates of Minors and Incompetents Admitted to State Institutions

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part I,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 169 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Guardian and Ward §§ 5 to 33.

§ 3-3-501.
Designation of conservators; exception.

The administrator of the Wyoming life resource center is appointed conservator of the estate of:

Each adult admitted to the Wyoming life resource center unless a conservator or other duly authorized agent has already been appointed for the person; and

Each minor with an estate of more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) admitted to the center unless a conservator has already been appointed for the minor.

The superintendent of the Wyoming state hospital is appointed conservator of the estate of:

Each adult resident adjudged to be a mentally incompetent person unless a conservator or other duly authorized agent has already been appointed for the person; and

Each minor with an estate of more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) admitted to the institution unless a conservator has already been appointed for the minor.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state training school generally, see chapter 5 of title 25.

As to state hospital generally, see chapter 10 of title 25.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “administrator” for “superintendent” in introductory language of (a); substituted “life resource center” for “state training school” in introductory language of (a) and (a)(i); and substituted “center” for “institution” in (a)(ii).

§ 3-3-502.
Duration of appointment; bonds.

A conservator appointed under this article shall serve as conservator of the estates of the patients or residents of the institution until a successor has been appointed and qualified or until the conservatorship for any individual ward is otherwise terminated. The conservator’s official bond as superintendent of the institution shall be sufficient security for all money and property coming into possession of the conservator unless the director of the department of health requires an additional bond.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

§ 3-3-503.
Authority generally; required reports.

The conservator may:

Receive money or property of the ward paid or delivered to him;

Disburse funds of the ward necessary for the support, maintenance and general welfare of the ward;

With the consent and approval of the director of the department of health, invest a reasonable amount of the funds in any investment authorized by Wyoming law, and reconvert the investment into cash when needed for the ward’s support and maintenance.

The conservator shall:

Deposit excess funds of the ward in a federally insured interest bearing account in a financial institution of his choice;

Submit an annual report to the court having jurisdiction accounting for all money and property coming into his possession for the benefit of each ward and itemizing all disbursements made from the ward’s assets.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Quoted in

Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2015 WY 157,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Dec. 29, 2015).

§ 3-3-504.
Transfer of funds to court appointed conservator.

If a conservator for a minor or incompetent person is appointed by a court of this state after the person has been admitted to the Wyoming life resource center or the Wyoming state hospital, the conservatorship created for the ward under this article shall terminate and all money and property of the ward in the possession of the conservator appointed under this article shall be delivered to the court appointed conservator upon proof of his appointment and qualification.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 2008, ch. 85, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “life resource center” for “state training school.”

§ 3-3-505.
Transfer of funds to successor upon termination of appointment as superintendent.

Upon termination of his appointment as superintendent of the institution, a conservator appointed under this article shall transfer to his successor all funds and property which he holds as conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-506.
Transfer of funds upon discharge, etc., of minor or incompetent.

Upon termination of the conservatorship by the death of the ward or by his discharge from the institution, all assets of the ward in the possession of a conservator appointed under this article shall be delivered to the person entitled by law to receive them.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.